Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 14.10 An Act Adopting the Federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2009
19-14.10-16.
Investigation and examination authority.

In addition to any authority allowed under this chapter the director, or the director’s designee, shall have the authority to conduct investigations and examinations as follows:

For purposes of initial licensing, license renewal, license suspension, license conditioning, license revocation or termination, or general or specific inquiry or investigation to determine compliance with this chapter, the director, or the director’s designee, shall have the authority to access, receive and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information or evidence including but not limited to:

Criminal, civil, and administrative history information, including non-conviction data, or other non-public record as specified in §

38-2-2(4)(D)

, specifically, or any other criminal, civil, and administrative record deemed non-public under §

38-2-1

et seq., generally; and

Personal history and experience information including independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in § 603(p) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(p); and

Any other documents, information, or evidence the director, or the director’s designee, deems relevant to the inquiry or investigation regardless of the location, possession, control, or custody of such documents, information, or evidence.

For the purposes of investigating violations or complaints arising under this chapter, or for the purposes of examination, the director, or the director’s designee, may review, investigate, or examine any licensee, individual, or person subject to this chapter, as often as necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The director, or the director’s designee, may direct, subpoena, or order the attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be required about the loans or the business or subject matter of any such examination or investigation, and may direct, subpoena, or order such person to produce books, accounts, records, files, and any other documents the director, or the director’s designee, deems relevant to the inquiry.

Each licensee, individual, or person subject to this chapter shall make available to the director, or the director’s designee, upon request, the books and records relating to the operations of such licensee, individual, or person subject to this chapter. The director, or the director’s designee, shall have access to such books and records and interview the officers, principals, mortgage loan originators, employees, independent contractors, agents, and customers of the licensee, individual, or person subject to this chapter concerning their business.

Each licensee, individual, or person subject to this chapter shall make or compile reports or prepare other information as directed by the director, or the director’s designee, in order to carry out the purposes of this section including but not limited to:

Accounting compilations;

Information lists and data concerning loan transactions in a format prescribed by the director, or the director’s designee; or

Such other information deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In making any examination or investigation authorized by this chapter, the director, or the director’s designee, may control access to any documents and records of the licensee or person under examination or investigation. The director, or the director’s designee, may take possession of the documents and records or place a person in exclusive charge of the documents and records in the place where they are usually kept. During the period of control, no individual or person shall remove or attempt to remove any of the documents and records except pursuant to a court order or with the consent of the director, or the director’s designee. Unless the director, or the director’s designee, has reasonable grounds to believe the documents or records of the licensee have been, or are at risk of being altered or destroyed for purposes of concealing a violation of this chapter, the licensee or owner of the documents and records shall have access to the documents or records as necessary to conduct its ordinary business affairs.

In order to carry out the purposes of this section, the director, or the director’s designee, may:

Retain attorneys, accountants, or other professionals and specialists as examiners, auditors, or investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct of examinations or investigations;

Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory associations in order to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, standardize or uniform methods or procedures, and documents, records, information or evidence obtained under this section;

Use, hire, contract, or employ public or privately available analytical systems, methods, or software to examine or investigate the licensee, individual, or person subject to this chapter;

Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by other government officials, within or without this state; or

Accept audit reports made by an independent certified public accountant for the licensee, individual, or person subject to this chapter in the course of that part of the examination covering the same general subject matter as the audit and may incorporate the audit report in the report of the examination, report of investigation or other writing of the director, or the director’s designee.

The authority of this section shall remain in effect, whether such a licensee, individual, or person subject to this chapter acts or claims to act under any licensing or registration law of this state, or claims to act without such authority.

No licensee, individual, or person subject to investigation or examination under this section may knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, records, computer records, or other information.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.

19-14.10-17.
Prohibited acts and practices.

It is a violation of this chapter for a person or individual subject to this chapter to:

Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice to defraud or mislead borrowers or lenders or to defraud any person;

Engage in any unfair or deceptive practice toward any person;

Obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation;

Solicit or enter into a contract with a borrower that provides in substance that the person or individual subject to this chapter may earn a fee or commission through “best efforts” to obtain a loan even though no loan is actually obtained for the borrower;

Solicit, advertise, or enter into a contract for specific interest rates, points, or other financing terms unless the terms are actually available at the time of soliciting, advertising, or contracting;

Conduct any business covered by this chapter without holding a valid license as required under this chapter, or assist or aid and abet any person in the conduct of business under this chapter without a valid license as required under this chapter;

Fail to make disclosures as required by this chapter and any other applicable state or federal law including regulations thereunder;

Fail to comply with this chapter or rules or regulations promulgated under this chapter, or fail to comply with any other state or federal law, including the rules and regulations thereunder, applicable to any business authorized or conducted under this chapter;

Make, in any manner, any false or deceptive statement or representation with regard to the rates, points, or other financing terms or conditions for a residential mortgage loan, or engage in bait-and-switch advertising;

Negligently make any false statement or knowingly and willfully make any omission of material fact in connection with any information or reports filed with a governmental agency or the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or in connection with any investigation conducted by the director, or the director’s designee, or another governmental agency;

Make any payment, threat, or promise, directly or indirectly, to any person for the purposes of influencing the independent judgment of the person in connection with a residential mortgage loan, or make any payment, threat, or promise, directly or indirectly, to any appraiser of a property, for the purposes of influencing the independent judgment of the appraiser with respect to the value of the property;

Collect, charge, attempt to collect or charge, or use or propose any agreement purporting to collect or charge, any fee prohibited by this chapter;

Cause or require a borrower to obtain property insurance coverage in an amount that exceeds the replacement cost of the improvements as established by the property insurer; or

Fail to truthfully account for monies belonging to a party to a residential mortgage loan transaction.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.

19-14.10-18.
Mortgage call reports.

Each lender, loan broker, or mortgage loan originator licensee shall submit to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry reports of condition, which shall be in such form and shall contain such information as the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.

19-14.10-19.
Report to Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

Subject to state privacy law the director, or the director’s designee, is required to report regularly violations of this chapter, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry subject to the provisions contained in §

19-1-4

-3.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.

19-14.10-20.
Reserved.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.

19-14.10-21.
Unique identifier shown.

The name and the unique identifier assigned by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System of any person originating a residential mortgage loan shall be clearly shown on all residential mortgage loan application forms, solicitations or advertisements, including business cards or websites, and any other documents as established by rule, regulation, or order of the director, or the director’s designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 4, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 4, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14.10-22.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 3.